District of Columbia statutes.
42-605

Special warranty.

A covenant by a grantor in a deed conveying real estate, “that he will warrant specially the property hereby conveyed,” or a grant of real estate in which the granting words are followed by the words “with special warranty,” shall have the same effect as if the grantor had covenanted that he, his heirs, devisees, and personal representatives will forever warrant and defend the said property unto the grantee, his heirs, devisees, personal representatives, and assigns against the claims and demands of the grantor and all persons claiming or to claim by, through, or under him.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1269, ch. 854, § 507
1981 Ed., § 45-505.
1973 Ed., § 45-305.